North Dakota, session 69, HB1010.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated from other funds derived from special funds and federal funds, to the
insurance commissioner for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the insurance commissioner, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $10,746,226 $3,955,150 $14,701,376
New and vacant FTE pool 0 325,136 325,136
Operating expenses 2,637,667 613,692 3,251,359
Capital assets 0 90,000 90,000
Grants 2,400,000 0 2,400,000
Total other funds $15,783,893 $4,983,978 $20,767,871
Full-time equivalent positions 47.00 10.00 57.00
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO THE
SEVENTIETH LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items
included in the appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget
for the 2027-29 biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the
seventieth legislative assembly regarding the use of this funding.
One-Time Funding Description Other Funds
Radios and x-ray machine $90,000
Accrued leave payout 30,000
Fire marshal compensatory time and overtime 20,000
Total other funds $140,000
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The
insurance commissioner may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line item in
section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds from the
new and vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item in accordance with the
guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-ninth
legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. ADDITIONAL INCOME - APPROPRIATION - REPORTING. In addition to the
amounts appropriated in section 1 of this Act, any federal funds that become available are appropriated
to the insurance commissioner, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The
insurance commissioner shall report any additional federal funds under this section to the office of
management and budget and the legislative council.

H. B. NO. 1010 - PAGE 2
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Subsection 8 of section 10-04-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
8. Fees. The fee, which must accompany the application, for registration, transfer, or notice filing,
and for each annual renewal thereof is:
a. For each broker-dealer $200.00$240.00
b. For each agent $60.00$75.00
c. For each investment adviser or federal covered adviser $100.00$120.00
d. For each investment adviser representative $50.00$60.00
An application to register as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser
representative may, with the consent of the commissioner, be withdrawn upon written
application.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-01-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
26.1-01-09. Salary of commissioner.
The annual salary of the commissioner is one hundred thirty thousand dollars through June 30,
2024, and one hundred thirty-five thousand two hundred dollars thirty - nine thousand two hundred
fifty - six dollars through June 30, 2026, and one hundred forty - three thousand four hundred thirty - four
dollars thereafter.
SECTION 7. A new section to chapter 26.1-23.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Government self-insurance pool - Report.
A government self-insurance pool organized under this chapter shall provide a report to the
legislative management by September thirtieth of each even-numbered year. The report must include
information on activities of the pool, including the claims activity, claims payment history, balances, a
history of complaints, and executive staff and board compensation.

H. B. NO. 1010 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1010.
House Vote: Yeas 81 Nays 8 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 2 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State